North Dakota, session 69, SB2017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated from special funds, to the office of administrative hearings for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the office of administrative hearings, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $1,446,690 $113,239 $1,559,929
New and vacant FTE pool 0 16,570 16,570
Operating expenses 1,582,392 (3,141) 1,579,251
Total special funds $3,029,082 $126,668 $3,155,750
Full-time equivalent positions 5.00 0.00 5.00
SECTION 2. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The office of
administrative hearings may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 3. BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA LINE OF CREDIT - AGENCY CASHFLOW NEEDS. The
office of administrative hearings may borrow up to $150,000 from the Bank of North Dakota through a
line of credit to manage agency cashflow needs during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. The interest rate on the line of credit may not exceed the prevailing interest rate
charged to North Dakota governmental entities. The office of administrative hearings shall repay the line
of credit with available funding from the administrative hearings fund.

S. B. NO. 2017 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2017.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 3 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State